Indiana, session 2026, HB1191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-48-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally possesses (pure or adulterated):
(A) more than two (2) ounces of marijuana;
(B) hash oil;
(C) hashish; or
(D) salvia;
(2) knowingly or intentionally grows or cultivates more than two
(2) ounces of marijuana; or
(3) knowing that more than two (2) ounces of marijuana is are
growing on the person's premises, fails to destroy the marijuana
plants;
commits possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, a Class
B misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through (c).
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Class A
misdemeanor if:
2026 IN 1191—LS 6738/DI 106


(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; or
(2) the:
(A) marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia is packaged in a
manner that appears to be low THC hemp extract; and
(B) person knew or reasonably should have known that the
product was marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; and
(2) the person possesses:
(A) at least thirty (30) grams four (4) ounces of marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
2026 IN 1191—LS 6738/DI 106